tests/normal nouns - ending with consonants.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-optimised-lookup
      Gen: ../khk.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../khk.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "цаг = time":
    цаг<n><nom> : цаг
    цаг<n><acc> : цагийг
    цаг<n><gen> : цагийн
    цаг<n><abl> : цагаас
    цаг<n><dat> : цагт

 "гар = hand":
    гар<n><nom> : гар
    гар<n><acc> : гарыг
    гар<n><gen> : гарын
    гар<n><abl> : гараас
    гар<n><dat> : гарт
    гар<n><pl><nom> : гарууд

 "үе = period":
    үе<n><nom> : үе
    үе<n><acc> : үеийг
    үе<n><gen> : үеийн
    үе<n><abl> : үеээс
    үе<n><dat> : үед
    үе<n><pl><nom> : үеүүд

 "гэр = house":
    гэр<n><nom> : гэр
    гэр<n><acc> : гэрийг
    гэр<n><gen> : гэрийн
    гэр<n><abl> : гэрээс
    гэр<n><dat> : гэрт
    гэр<n><pl><nom> : гэрүүд

 "хот = city":
    хот<n><nom> : хот
    хот<n><acc> : хотыг
    хот<n><gen> : хотын
    хот<n><abl> : хотоос
    хот<n><dat> : хотод
    хот<n><pl><nom> : хотууд

 "сар = month":
    сар<n><nom> : сар
    сар<n><acc> : сарыг
    сар<n><gen> : сарын
    сар<n><abl> : сараас
    сар<n><dat> : сард
    сар<n><pl><nom> : сарууд

 "анги = classroom":
    анги<n><nom> : анги
    анги<n><acc> : ангийг
    анги<n><gen> : ангийн
    анги<n><abl> : ангиас
    анги<n><dat> : ангид

 "ном = book":
    ном<n><nom> : ном
    ном<n><acc> : номыг
    ном<n><gen> : номын
    ном<n><abl> : номоос
    ном<n><dat> : номд

 "хүүхэд = child":
    хүүхэд<n><nom> : хүүхэд
    хүүхэд<n><acc> : хүүхдийг
    хүүхэд<n><gen> : хүүхдийн
    хүүхэд<n><abl> : хүүхдээс
    хүүхэд<n><dat> : хүүхдэд
    хүүхэд<n><pl><nom> : хүүхдүүд

 "улс = country":
    улс<n><nom> : улс
    улс<n><acc> : улсыг
    улс<n><gen> : улсын
    улс<n><abl> : улсаас
    улс<n><dat> : улсад
    улс<n><pl><nom> : улсууд

 "оршил = introduction":
    оршил<n><nom> : оршил
    оршил<n><acc> : оршлыг
    оршил<n><gen> : оршлын
    оршил<n><abl> : оршлоос
    оршил<n><dat> : оршилд
    оршил<n><pl><nom> : оршлууд

 "тойм = report/review/summary?":
    тойм<n><nom> : тойм
    тойм<n><acc> : тоймыг
    тойм<n><gen> : тоймын
    тойм<n><abl> : тоймоос
    тойм<n><dat> : тоймд
    тойм<n><pl><nom> : тоймууд

 "ажил = work":
    ажил<n><nom> : ажил
    ажил<n><acc> : ажлыг
    ажил<n><gen> : ажлын
    ажил<n><abl> : ажлаас
    ажил<n><inst> : ажлаар
    ажил<n><dat> : ажилд
    ажил<n><pl><nom> : ажлууд

 "өгүүлэл = speech/presentation":
    өгүүлэл<n><nom> : өгүүлэл
    өгүүлэл<n><acc> : өгүүллийг
    өгүүлэл<n><gen> : өгүүллийн
    өгүүлэл<n><abl> : өгүүллээс
    өгүүлэл<n><dat> : өгүүлэлд
    өгүүлэл<n><pl><nom> : өгүүллүүд

 "сэдэв = topic/theme":
    сэдэв<n><nom> : сэдэв
    сэдэв<n><acc> : сэдвийг
    сэдэв<n><gen> : сэдвийн
    сэдэв<n><abl> : сэдвээс
    сэдэв<n><dat> : сэдэвт
    сэдэв<n><pl><nom> : сэдвүүд

 "долоо хоног = week":
    долоо хоног<n><nom> : долоо хоног
    долоо хоног<n><acc> : долоо хоногийг
    долоо хоног<n><gen> : долоо хоногийн
    долоо хоног<n><abl> : долоо хоногоос
    долоо хоног<n><dat> : долоо хоногд
    долоо хоног<n><pl><nom> : долоо хоногууд

 "сургууль = school":
    сургууль<n><nom> : сургууль
    сургууль<n><acc> : сургуулийг
    сургууль<n><gen> : сургуулийн
    сургууль<n><abl> : сургуулиас
    сургууль<n><dat> : сургуульд
    сургууль<n><pl><nom> : сургуулиуд
